dix/consistent-monA.dix
    <pardef n="another__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="other__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="several__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="her__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/is__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ese</l> 
        <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/at__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>at</l> 
        <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ose</l> 
        <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="second__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="many__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="much__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enough__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="what__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_many__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_much__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="all__predet">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="predet"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="al__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mine__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="everyone__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="something__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/is__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ese</l> 
        <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/at__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>at</l> 
        <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ose</l> 
        <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="both__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="all__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="the_other__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="what__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="which_one__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_many__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="how_much__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="whose__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="what__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="those_who__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="that__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="where__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="'s__gen">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="gen"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hello__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="ij"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="tiel ke">
        <i>tiel<b/>ke</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="en konsento kun">
        <i>en<b/>konsento<b/>kun</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ekde">
        <i>ekde</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sed">
        <i>sed</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kontraŭ">
        <i>kontraŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="al">
        <i>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="antaŭ ol">
        <i>antaŭ<b/>ol</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pro">
        <i>pro</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tra">
        <i>tra</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉirkaŭ">
        <i>ĉirkaŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sur">
        <i>sur</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="antaŭ">
        <i>antaŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malantaŭ">
        <i>malantaŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="de">
        <i>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="post">
        <i>post</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="escepte">
        <i>escepte</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="escepte de">
        <i>escepte<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kune">
        <i>kune</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="en">
        <i>en</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dum">
        <i>dum</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="inter">
        <i>inter</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="krom">
        <i>krom</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝis">
        <i>ĝis</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malgraŭ">
        <i>malgraŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malpli">
        <i>malpli</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pli">
        <i>pli</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="por">
        <i>por</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pro">
        <i>pro</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="laŭ">
        <i>laŭ</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sen">
        <i>sen</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sub">
        <i>sub</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tra">
        <i>tra</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kun">
        <i>kun</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rilate al">
        <i>rilate<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="laŭlonge de">
        <i>laŭlonge<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kiel">
        <i>kiel</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="zorge de">
        <i>zorge<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kun la celo">
        <i>kun<b/>la<b/>celo</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="okaze de">
        <i>okaze<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rilate al">
        <i>rilate<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="konfome al">
        <i>konfome<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fronte al">
        <i>fronte<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="koncerne al">
        <i>koncerne<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="koncerne al">
        <i>koncerne<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="en la mezo de">
        <i>en<b/>la<b/>mezo<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fronte al">
        <i>fronte<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="danke al">
        <i>danke<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="per">
        <i>per</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="per multe da">
        <i>per<b/>multe<b/>da</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pere de">
        <i>pere<b/>de</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="koncerne al">
        <i>koncerne<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="koncerne al">
        <i>koncerne<b/>al</i> 
        <par n="al__pr" /> 
    </e>
